Illinois, session 104th, HB1624.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 4a-1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/4a-1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.4a-1)7    Sec. 4a-1. The The Self-Insurers Advisory Board is hereby 8established within the Commission for the purpose of providing 9for the continuation of workers' compensation and occupational 10disease benefits due and unpaid or interrupted due to the 11inability of an insolvent self-insurer as defined in 12subsection (d) of Section 4a-2 to meet its compensation 13obligations when the employers' financial resources, security 14deposit, guaranty agreements, surety agreements and excess 15insurance are either inadequate or not immediately accessible 16for the payment of benefits, and to review and recommend to the 17Chairman of the Commission the disposition of all initial and 18renewal applications to self-insure filed by private 19self-insurers under this Act and the Workers' Occupational 20Diseases Act.21(Source: P.A. 85-1385.)